Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin BOARD OF PUBLIC DEFENSE.new text end new text begin $6,900,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $13,700,00 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Public Defense. The appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is available until July 1, 2027. These appropriations are in addition to the amounts appropriated in Laws 2025, chapter 35, article 1, section 10. The base is $183,529,000 beginning in fiscal year 2028. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end